HunSpellDictionaries/he_IL.aff
FLAG num
SFX  12575 Y 1
SFX  12575 0 למי/64991 .
SFX  13683 Y 1
SFX  13683 0 למי/64992 .
SFX  12842 Y 1
SFX  12842 0 יאן/64991 .
SFX  8253 Y 1
SFX  8253 0 עם/64991 .
SFX  12073 Y 1
SFX  12073 0 למי/64993 .
SFX  6803 Y 1
SFX  6803 0 יאן/64992 .
SFX  5482 Y 1
SFX  5482 0 עם/64992 .
SFX  10424 Y 1
SFX  10424 0 סד/64991 .
SFX  10233 Y 1
SFX  10233 0 יאן/64993 .
SFX  7226 Y 1
SFX  7226 0 עם/64993 .
SFX  10353 Y 1
SFX  10353 0 למי/64995 .
SFX  7010 Y 1
SFX  7010 0 סד/64992 .
SFX  12701 Y 1
SFX  12701 0 אל/64991 .
SFX  11932 Y 1
SFX  11932 0 אל/64992 .
SFX  5546 Y 1
SFX  5546 0 אל/64993 .
SFX  10669 Y 1
SFX  10669 0 יאן/64998 .
SFX  8675 Y 1
SFX  8675 0 עם/64998 .
SFX  8365 Y 1
SFX  8365 0 אותיהם/64991 .
SFX  12681 Y 1
SFX  12681 0 ישתנו/64991 .
SFX  10249 Y 1
SFX  10249 0 ישתנו/64992 .
SFX  8610 Y 1
SFX  8610 0 אותיהם/64993 .
SFX  7853 Y 1
SFX  7853 0 לוג/64991 .
SFX  11979 Y 1
SFX  11979 0 צו/64991 .
SFX  7114 Y 1
SFX  7114 0 צו/64992 .
SFX  13769 Y 1
SFX  13769 ם נם/64993 .
SFX  7152 Y 1
SFX  7152 0 צו/64993 .
SFX  6240 Y 1
SFX  6240 0 זינו/64991 .
SFX  13977 Y 1
SFX  13977 0 זינו/64992 .
SFX  10523 Y 1
SFX  10523 0 צו/64995 .
SFX  12074 Y 1
SFX  12074 ר תר/64991 .
SFX  5781 Y 1
SFX  5781 0 זינו/64993 .
SFX  12964 Y 1
SFX  12964 ן סה/64991 .
SFX  10121 Y 1
SFX  10121 0 זינו/64994 .
SFX  6315 Y 1
SFX  6315 ר תר/64992 .
SFX  9540 Y 1
SFX  9540 0 טתוה/64992 .
SFX  9001 Y 1
SFX  9001 ם נם/64998 .
SFX  7370 Y 1
SFX  7370 ן סה/64992 .
SFX  11206 Y 1
SFX  11206 0 צו/64999 .
SFX  8366 Y 1
SFX  8366 0 אותיה/64991 .
SFX  8611 Y 1
SFX  8611 0 אותיה/64993 .
SFX  10589 Y 1
SFX  10589 ר תר/64997 .
SFX  5996 Y 1
SFX  5996 0 שותי/64993 .
SFX  13709 Y 1
SFX  13709 ך כנה/64992 .
SFX  13416 Y 1
SFX  13416 0 וניה/64991 .
SFX  13889 Y 1
SFX  13889 0 וניה/64992 .
SFX  10433 Y 1
SFX  10433 ך כנה/64994 .
SFX  5162 Y 1
SFX  5162 0 וניה/64993 .
SFX  11866 Y 1
SFX  11866 ח ידום/64992 .
SFX  12991 Y 1
SFX  12991 0 טש/64991 .
SFX  9788 Y 1
SFX  9788 0 קתום/64992 .
SFX  6849 Y 1
SFX  6849 0 טש/64992 .
SFX  7206 Y 1
SFX  7206 0 יגה/64991 .
SFX  5697 Y 1
SFX  5697 0 יגה/64992 .
SFX  11681 Y 1
SFX  11681 0 אלי/64991 .
SFX  10886 Y 1
SFX  10886 0 יגה/64993 .
SFX  5997 Y 1
SFX  5997 0 שותו/64993 .
SFX  13800 Y 1
SFX  13800 0 אלי/64992 .
SFX  12722 Y 1
SFX  12722 0 אלי/64993 .
SFX  11947 Y 1
SFX  11947 ר תה/64991 .
SFX  9506 Y 1
SFX  9506 0 יגה/64999 .
SFX  5639 Y 1
SFX  5639 ר תה/64992 .
SFX  11986 Y 1
SFX  11986 0 צתן/64991 .
SFX  5422 Y 1
SFX  5422 ר תה/64993 .
SFX  7126 Y 1
SFX  7126 0 צתן/64992 .
SFX  10811 Y 1
SFX  10811 0 צתן/64993 .
SFX  8003 Y 1
SFX  8003 0 כה/64991 .
SFX  10355 Y 1
SFX  10355 ר תה/64998 .
SFX  5481 Y 1
SFX  5481 0 כה/64992 .
SFX  12069 Y 1
SFX  12069 ל סן/64991 .
SFX  11221 Y 1
SFX  11221 ר תה/64999 .
SFX  9040 Y 1
SFX  9040 0 קך/64991 .
SFX  5657 Y 1
SFX  5657 0 כה/64993 .
SFX  5159 Y 1
SFX  5159 0 קך/64992 .
SFX  5024 Y 1
SFX  5024 ל סן/64992 .
SFX  7823 Y 1
SFX  7823 0 קך/64993 .
SFX  7648 Y 1
SFX  7648 ה ולה/64991 .
SFX  7210 Y 1
SFX  7210 ל סן/64993 .
SFX  13490 Y 1
SFX  13490 0 קך/64996 .
SFX  10396 Y 1
SFX  10396 0 כה/64998 .
SFX  8364 Y 1
SFX  8364 0 אותיהן/64991 .
SFX  12680 Y 1
SFX  12680 0 ישתני/64991 .
SFX  11620 Y 1
SFX  11620 0 כה/64999 .
SFX  11086 Y 1
SFX  11086 ל סן/64998 .
SFX  10248 Y 1
SFX  10248 0 ישתני/64992 .
SFX  9233 Y 1
SFX  9233 0 קך/64998 .
SFX  8609 Y 1
SFX  8609 0 אותיהן/64993 .
SFX  8482 Y 1
SFX  8482 0 ולך/64993 .
SFX  7852 Y 1
SFX  7852 0 לוגים/64991 .
SFX  10881 Y 1
SFX  10881 ך כתן/64992 .
SFX  6637 Y 1
SFX  6637 ל ננה/64992 .
SFX  10556 Y 1
SFX  10556 ח טרי/64991 .
SFX  13757 Y 1
SFX  13757 ח טרי/64992 .
SFX  12613 Y 1
SFX  12613 ח טרי/64993 .
SFX  11440 Y 1
SFX  11440 ח טרי/64995 .
SFX  9539 Y 1
SFX  9539 0 טתוהו/64992 .
SFX  11370 Y 1
SFX  11370 ל ננה/64999 .
SFX 2675 Y 1
SFX 2675 0 לוגיה .
SFX 2799 Y 1
SFX 2799 0 לוגיי .
SFX 3441 Y 1
SFX 3441 0 לוגים .
SFX 2951 Y 1
SFX 2951 0 לוגית .
SFX 1449 Y 1
SFX 1449 0 ישה .
SFX 1754 Y 1
SFX 1754 0 ישו .
SFX 1927 Y 1
SFX 1927 0 ישי .
SFX 1543 Y 1
SFX 1543 0 ישך .
SFX 1540 Y 1
SFX 1540 0 ישם .
SFX 1448 Y 1
SFX 1448 0 ישן .
SFX 4942 Y 1
SFX 4942 0 זהו .
SFX 4801 Y 1
SFX 4801 0 ישת .
SFX 455 Y 1
SFX 455 0 רותייך .
SFX 4985 Y 1
SFX 4985 0 וגינו .
SFX 4586 Y 1
SFX 4586 0 בתיה .
SFX 4584 Y 1
SFX 4584 0 בתיו .
SFX 4583 Y 1
SFX 4583 0 בתיך .
SFX 4153 Y 1
SFX 4153 0 בתים .
SFX 4580 Y 1
SFX 4580 0 בתין .
SFX 4110 Y 1
SFX 4110 0 וגה .
SFX 4553 Y 1
SFX 4553 0 וגו .
SFX 2859 Y 1
SFX 2859 0 וגי .
SFX 4109 Y 1
SFX 4109 0 וגך .
SFX 4106 Y 1
SFX 4106 0 וגם .
SFX 4105 Y 1
SFX 4105 0 וגן .
SFX 2633 Y 1
SFX 2633 0 מותנו .
SFX 719 Y 1
SFX 719 0 מינו .
SFX 1959 Y 1
SFX 1959 0 מיני .
SFX 4359 Y 1
SFX 4359 0 ישתכם .
SFX 4358 Y 1
SFX 4358 0 ישתכן .
SFX 471 Y 1
SFX 471 0 פכם .
SFX 470 Y 1
SFX 470 0 פכן .
SFX 1834 Y 1
SFX 1834 0 יתינו .
SFX 2062 Y 1
SFX 2062 0 יתיני .
SFX 1454 Y 1
SFX 1454 0 יעכם .
SFX 1453 Y 1
SFX 1453 0 יעכן .
SFX 3194 Y 1
SFX 3194 0 וגיה .
SFX 4990 Y 1
SFX 4990 0 וגיו .
SFX 3193 Y 1
SFX 3193 0 וגיי .
SFX 4988 Y 1
SFX 4988 0 וגיך .
SFX 3551 Y 1
SFX 3551 0 וגים .
SFX 1088 Y 1
SFX 1088 0 תנה .
SFX 37 Y 1
SFX 37 0 תנו .
SFX 74 Y 1
SFX 74 0 תני .
SFX 2826 Y 1
SFX 2826 0 יטוה .
SFX 2824 Y 1
SFX 2824 0 יטוך .
SFX 2823 Y 1
SFX 2823 0 יטום .
SFX 2822 Y 1
SFX 2822 0 יטון .
SFX 3765 Y 1
SFX 3765 0 יטות .
SFX 1264 Y 1
SFX 1264 0 סיכם .
SFX 1263 Y 1
SFX 1263 0 סיכן .
SFX 421 Y 1
SFX 421 0 וננו .
SFX 1085 Y 1
SFX 1085 0 ידה .
SFX 1397 Y 1
SFX 1397 0 ידו .
SFX 1396 Y 1
SFX 1396 0 ידי .
SFX 1125 Y 1
SFX 1125 0 ידך .
SFX 1122 Y 1
SFX 1122 0 ידם .
SFX 1121 Y 1
SFX 1121 0 ידן .
SFX 2320 Y 1
SFX 2320 0 ידת .
SFX 2416 Y 1
SFX 2416 0 חותכם .
SFX 2415 Y 1
SFX 2415 0 חותכן .
SFX 1279 Y 1
SFX 1279 0 טותינו .
SFX 1253 Y 1
SFX 1253 0 לונו .
SFX 1226 Y 1
SFX 1226 0 לוני .
SFX 1712 Y 1
SFX 1712 0 סטיי .
SFX 1318 Y 1
SFX 1318 0 סטים .
SFX 1154 Y 1
SFX 1154 0 סטית .
SFX 2786 Y 1
SFX 2786 0 סד .
SFX 473 Y 1
SFX 473 0 סה .
SFX 561 Y 1
SFX 561 0 סו .
SFX 1299 Y 1
SFX 1299 0 סט .
SFX 517 Y 1
SFX 517 0 סי .
SFX 811 Y 1
SFX 811 0 סך .
SFX 4267 Y 1
SFX 4267 0 סל .
SFX 700 Y 1
SFX 700 0 סם .
SFX 732 Y 1
SFX 732 0 סן .
SFX 2540 Y 1
SFX 2540 0 סס .
SFX 3229 Y 1
SFX 3229 0 סף .
SFX 3640 Y 1
SFX 3640 0 סק .
SFX 2539 Y 1
SFX 2539 0 סר .
SFX 677 Y 1
SFX 677 0 סת .
SFX 2196 Y 1
SFX 2196 0 ירונו .
SFX 2195 Y 1
SFX 2195 0 ירוני .
SFX 4209 Y 1
SFX 4209 0 קתיהו .
SFX 1335 Y 1
SFX 1335 0 צתכם .
SFX 1334 Y 1
SFX 1334 0 צתכן .
SFX 2172 Y 1
SFX 2172 0 רויותייך .
SFX 2407 Y 1
SFX 2407 0 טיהו .
SFX 1188 Y 1
SFX 1188 0 טיהם .
SFX 1187 Y 1
SFX 1187 0 טיהן .
SFX 418 Y 1
SFX 418 0 בנה .
SFX 308 Y 1
SFX 308 0 בנו .
SFX 875 Y 1
SFX 875 0 בני .
SFX 3739 Y 1
SFX 3739 0 יפיהם .
SFX 3738 Y 1
SFX 3738 0 יפיהן .
SFX 3789 Y 1
SFX 3789 0 ידותייך .
SFX 2310 Y 1
SFX 2310 0 יכהו .
SFX 1666 Y 1
SFX 1666 0 רותנו .
SFX 3032 Y 1
SFX 3032 0 ומיכם .
SFX 3031 Y 1
SFX 3031 0 ומיכן .
SFX 4506 Y 1
SFX 4506 0 טנוהו .
SFX 44 Y 1
SFX 44 0 תיכם .
SFX 43 Y 1
SFX 43 0 תיכן .
SFX 4587 Y 1
SFX 4587 0 ברות .
SFX 4685 Y 1
SFX 4685 0 ענוהו .
SFX 1542 Y 1
SFX 1542 0 ישכם .
SFX 1541 Y 1
SFX 1541 0 ישכן .
SFX 3539 Y 1
SFX 3539 0 וייה .
SFX 3536 Y 1
SFX 3536 0 וייו .
SFX 4540 Y 1
SFX 4540 0 וסי .
SFX 2428 Y 1
SFX 2428 0 וייך .
SFX 3533 Y 1
SFX 3533 0 ויים .
SFX 1555 Y 1
SFX 1555 0 יריה .
SFX 2378 Y 1
SFX 2378 0 יריו .
SFX 2194 Y 1
SFX 2194 0 יריי .
SFX 2376 Y 1
SFX 2376 0 יריך .
SFX 1192 Y 1
SFX 1192 0 ירים .
SFX 2478 Y 1
SFX 2478 0 ירין .
SFX 1966 Y 1
SFX 1966 0 יבינו .
SFX 4048 Y 1
SFX 4048 0 יביני .
SFX 2814 Y 1
SFX 2814 0 יעוהו .
SFX 994 Y 1
SFX 994 0 פתה .
SFX 993 Y 1
SFX 993 0 פתו .
SFX 782 Y 1
SFX 782 0 פתי .
SFX 1005 Y 1
SFX 1005 0 פתך .
SFX 651 Y 1
SFX 651 0 פתם .
SFX 650 Y 1
SFX 650 0 פתן .
SFX 3922 Y 1
SFX 3922 0 סוה .
SFX 3920 Y 1
SFX 3920 0 סוך .
SFX 3646 Y 1
SFX 3646 0 סום .
SFX 3645 Y 1
SFX 3645 0 סון .
SFX 808 Y 1
SFX 808 0 סות .
SFX 2893 Y 1
SFX 2893 0 ריותיהם .
SFX 2892 Y 1
SFX 2892 0 ריותיהן .
SFX 2692 Y 1
SFX 2692 0 יעתה .
SFX 2691 Y 1
SFX 2691 0 יעתו .
SFX 2690 Y 1
SFX 2690 0 יעתך .
SFX 2573 Y 1
SFX 2573 0 יעתם .
SFX 2572 Y 1
SFX 2572 0 יעתן .
SFX 2159 Y 1
SFX 2159 0 רתוהו .
